Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2289.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 15-481, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-481. Override election; budget increases; informational pamphlet; notice; ballot; effect A. If a proposed budget of a school district exceeds the aggregate budget limit for the budget year, at least ninety days before the proposed election the governing board shall order an override election to be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F for the purpose of presenting the proposed budget to the qualified electors of the school district who by a majority of those voting either shall affirm or reject the budget. At the same time as the order of the election, the governing board shall publicly declare the deadline for submitting arguments, as set by the county school superintendent pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 9 of this section, to be submitted in the informational pamphlet and shall immediately post the deadline in a prominent location on the district's website. In addition, the governing board shall prepare an alternate budget that does not include an increase in the budget of more than the amount allowed as provided in section 15-905. If the qualified electors approve the proposed budget, the governing board of the school district shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that includes the authorized increase. If the qualified electors disapprove the proposed budget, the governing board shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that does not include the proposed increase or the portion of the proposed increase that exceeds the amount authorized by a previously approved budget increase as prescribed in subsection P of this section. B. The county school superintendent shall prepare an informational pamphlet on the proposed increase in the budget and a sample ballot and, at least forty days before the election, shall transmit the informational pamphlet and the sample ballot to the governing board of the school district. The governing board, on receipt of the informational pamphlet and the ballot, shall mail or distribute the informational pamphlet and the ballot to the households in which qualified electors reside within the school district at least thirty-five days before the election. Any distribution of material concerning the proposed increase in the budget shall not be conducted by children enrolled in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain the following information: 1. The date of the election. 2. The voter's polling place and the times it is open. 3. The proposed total increase in the budget that exceeds the amount allowed pursuant to section 15-905. 4. The total amount of the current year's budget, the total amount of the proposed budget and the total amount of the alternate budget. 5. If the override is for a period of more than one year, a statement indicating the number of years the proposed increase in the budget would be in effect and the percentage of the school district's revenue control limit that the district is requesting for the future years. 6. The proposed total amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and the amount that will be obtained from a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 7. The proposed amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and that will be obtained from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 8. The dollar amount and the purpose for which the proposed increase in the budget is to be expended for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. The purpose statement shall only present factual information in a neutral manner. Advocacy for the expenditures is strictly limited to the arguments submitted pursuant to paragraph 9 of this subsection. 9. At least two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments for and two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments against the proposed increase in the budget. The arguments shall be in a form prescribed by the county school superintendent, and each argument shall not exceed two hundred words. Arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing and signed by the governing board. The ballot arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed increase. If submitted, additional arguments in favor of the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in favor. Arguments against the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in opposition. If the argument is submitted by an organization, it shall contain the sworn statement of two executive officers of the organization. If the argument is submitted by a political committee, it shall contain the sworn statement of the committee's chairperson or treasurer. If the argument is submitted by an individual and not on behalf of an organization, a political committee or any other group, the person individual shall submit the argument with a sworn, notarized statement. The names of persons and entities submitting written arguments shall be included in the informational pamphlet. Persons signing the argument shall identify themselves by giving their residence address and telephone number, which may not appear in the informational pamphlet, except that the person's city or town and state of residence shall appear in the pamphlet. Any argument that is submitted and that does not comply with this paragraph may not be included in the pamphlet. The county school superintendent shall review all factual statements contained in the written arguments and correct any inaccurate statements of fact. The superintendent shall not review and correct any portion of the written arguments that are identified as statements of the author's opinion. The county school superintendent shall make the written arguments available to the public as provided in title 39, chapter 1, article 2. A deadline for submitting arguments to be included in the informational pamphlet shall be set by the county school superintendent. 10. A statement that the alternate budget shall be adopted by the governing board if the proposed budget is not adopted by the qualified electors of the school district. 11. The current limited property value and the net assessed valuation provided by the department of revenue, the first year tax rate for the proposed override and the estimated amount of the secondary property taxes if the proposed budget is adopted for each of the following: (a) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is the average assessed valuation of property classified as class three, as prescribed by section 42-12003 for the current year in the school district. (b) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is one-half of the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (c) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is twice the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (d) A business whose assessed valuation is the average of the assessed valuation of property classified as class one, as prescribed by section 42-12001, paragraphs 12 and 13 for the current year in the school district. 12. If the election is conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital improvement plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the budget increase and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $80,000 $100,000 and $300,000. C. For the purpose of this section, the school district may use its staff, equipment, materials, buildings or other resources only to distribute the informational pamphlet at the school district office or at public hearings and to produce such information as required in subsection B of this section. This subsection does not preclude school districts from holding or participating in any public hearings at which testimony is given by at least one person for the proposed increase and one person against the proposed increase. Any written information provided by the district pertaining to the override election shall include financial information showing the estimated first year tax rate for the proposed budget override amount. D. If any amount of the proposed increase will be funded by a levy of taxes in the district, the election prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F. If the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes, the elections prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on any date prescribed by section 16-204. The elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in the manner prescribed in article 1 of this chapter, sections 15-422, through 15-423, 15-424 and section 15-426, relating to special elections, except that: 1. The notices required pursuant to section 15-403 shall be posted not less than twenty-five days before the election. 2. Ballots shall be counted pursuant to title 16, chapter 4, article 10. E. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for ____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $_____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. F. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain: 1. The amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget. 2. A statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section. 3. The following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. G. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is fifteen percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year.  If a school district requests an override pursuant to section 15-482 or to continue with a budget override pursuant to section 15-482 for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three that was authorized before December 31, 2008, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is ten percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year. H. Special budget override provisions for school districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve are as follows: 1. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsections E and F of this section is the greater of the amount prescribed in subsection G of this section or a limit computed as follows: (a) For common or unified districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.358 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down              School District Base       Reduction Factor        Elementary Limit $150,000    -  $ = $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.278 + (0.0003 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Elementary Limit $150,000      $ =  $ (b) For unified or union high school districts with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  100 x 1.468 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ __ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down                District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level_   Factor  100 x  1.398 + (0.0004 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (c) If both subdivisions (a) and (b) of this paragraph apply to a unified school district, its limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the combination of its elementary limit and its secondary limit. (d) If only subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph applies to a unified school district, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the sum of the limit computed as provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph plus ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that do not meet the eligibility requirements of this subsection. If a school district budgets monies outside the revenue control limit pursuant to section 15-949, subsection E, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is only the ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that are not included under section 15-949, subsection E. For the purposes of this subdivision, the revenue control limit is separated into elementary and secondary components based on the weighted student count as provided in section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). 2. If a school district utilizes this subsection to request an override of more than one year, the ballot shall include an estimate of the amount of the proposed increase in the future years in place of the statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, as prescribed in subsections E and F of this section. 3. Notwithstanding subsection P of this section, the maximum period of an override authorized pursuant to this subsection is five years. 4. Subsection P, paragraphs 1 and 2 of this section do not apply to overrides authorized pursuant to this subsection. I. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section, and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget that will be funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district would require an estimated tax rate of $__________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. J. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. K. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section, or a combination of both of these subsections, is five percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year. For a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through eight as provided in section 15-971, subsection B.  For a unified school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. For a union high school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in grades nine through twelve. L. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year in which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's district additional assistance allowed by law. M. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year in which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. N. If the election is to exceed a combination of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section or district additional assistance as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the ballot shall be prepared so that the voters may vote on each proposed increase separately and shall contain statements required in the same manner as if each proposed increase were submitted separately. O. If the election provides for a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, at least thirty days before the election, the department of revenue shall provide the school district governing board and the county school superintendent with the current net assessed valuation of the school district. The governing board and the county school superintendent shall use the current net assessed valuation of the school district to translate the amount of the proposed dollar increase in the budget of the school district over that allowed by law into a tax rate figure. P. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection E of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection F of this section, the school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase.  If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted, which shall not exceed the maximum amount allowed under subsection G of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect. If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. Q. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized.  Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection I of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection J of this section, the increase may only be budgeted and expended if sufficient monies are available in the maintenance and operation fund of the school district. If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection I or J of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted that does not exceed the maximum amount permitted under subsection K of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect.  If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. R. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection L of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years. For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. S. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection M of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance and capital outlay fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years. For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. T. In addition to subsections P and S of this section, from the maintenance and operation fund and capital outlay fund ending cash balances, the school district governing board shall first use any available revenues to reduce its primary tax rate to zero and shall use any remaining revenues to fund the additional increase authorized as provided in subsections F and M of this section. U. If the voters in a school district disapprove the proposed budget, the alternate budget that, except for any budget increase authorized by a prior election, does not include an increase in the budget in excess of the amount provided in section 15-905 shall be adopted by the governing board as provided in section 15-905. V. The governing board may request that any override election be cancelled if any change in chapter 9 of this title changes the amount of the aggregate budget limit as provided in section 15-905.  The request to cancel the override election shall be made to the county school superintendent at least eighty days before the date of the scheduled override election. W. For any election conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement in addition to any other statement required by this section: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this override election are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. ___________ school district is proposing to increase its budget by $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. X. If the voters approve the budget increase pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the school district shall not use the override proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the override proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. Y. Each school district that currently increases its budget pursuant to this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31 at which an update of the programs or capital improvements financed through the override is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment and: 1. If the increase is pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, at a minimum, the update shall include the progress of capital improvements financed through the override, a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved bonding in funding capital improvements, if any. 2. If the increase is pursuant to subsection E, F, I or J of this section, the update shall include at a minimum the amount expended in the previous fiscal year and the amount included in the current budget for each of the purposes listed in the informational pamphlet prescribed by subsection B of this section. Z. If a budget in excess of district additional assistance was previously adopted by the voters in a school district and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the governing board may request an additional budget in excess of district additional assistance. If the voters in a school district authorize the additional budget in excess of district additional assistance, the existing district additional assistance budget increase remains in effect. AA. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum budget increase that may be authorized pursuant to subsection L or M of this section is ten percent of the school district's revenue control limit. BB. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for _______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. CC. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Section 15-491, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-491. Elections on school property; exceptions A. The governing board of a school district may, and on petition of fifteen percent of the school electors as shown by the poll list at the last preceding annual school election shall, call an election for the following purposes: 1. To locate or change the location of school buildings. 2. To purchase or sell school sites or buildings or sell school sites pursuant to section 15-342 or to build school buildings, but the authorization by vote of the school district shall not necessarily specify the site to be purchased. 3. To decide whether the bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising monies for purchasing or leasing school lots, for building or renovating school buildings, for supplying school buildings with furniture, equipment and technology, for improving school grounds, for purchasing pupil transportation vehicles or for liquidating any indebtedness already incurred for such purposes.  Bonds issued for furniture, equipment and technology, other than fixtures, shall mature not later than the July 1 that follows the fifth year after the bonds were issued.  A school district shall not issue class B bonds until the school district has obligated in contract the entire proceeds of any class A bonds issued by the school district. The total amount of class A and class B bonds issued by a school district shall not exceed the debt limitations prescribed in article IX, sections 8 and 8.1, Constitution of Arizona. 4. To lease for twenty or more years, as lessor or as lessee, school buildings or grounds. Approval by a majority of the school district electors voting authorizes the governing board to negotiate for and enter into a lease. The ballot shall list the school buildings or grounds for which a lease is sought. If the governing board does not enter into a lease of twenty or more years of the school buildings or grounds listed on the ballot within twenty years after the date of the election and the board continues to seek such a lease, the governing board shall call a special election to reauthorize the board to negotiate for and to enter into a lease of twenty or more years. 5. To change the list of capital projects or the purposes authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds. 6. To extend from six to ten years the time period to issue class B bonds authorized in 2009 or earlier.  Elections pursuant to this paragraph may not be held later than the sixth November after the election approving the issuance of the bonds. B. A petition is not required for holding the first election to be held in a joint common school district for any of the purposes specified in subsection A of this section. The certification of election results required by section 15-493 shall be made to the board of supervisors of the jurisdictional county. C. When the election is called to determine whether or not bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purposes enumerated in the call for the election, the question shall be submitted to the vote of the qualified electors of the school district as defined in section 15-401 and subject to section 15-402. D. The governing board shall order the election to be held and the election notice and procedures to be conducted in the manner prescribed in title 35, chapter 3, article 3. If a petition for an election has been filed with the governing board as provided in subsection A of this section, the board shall act on the petition within sixty days by ordering the election to be held as provided in this subsection. If a school district bond election is scheduled for the same date a school district will hold an override election, the governing body shall deliver a copy of the notice of election and ballot to the county school superintendent who shall include the notice of election and ballot with the informational pamphlet and ballot prepared for the override election. Mailing of the information required for both the override and bond elections shall constitute compliance with the notice provisions of this section. E. The elections to be held pursuant to this section shall only be held on dates prescribed by section 16-204, except that elections held pursuant to this section to decide whether class B bonds shall be issued, or any other obligation incurred that will require the assessment of secondary property taxes, shall only be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. F. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section does not apply to the sale of school property if the market value of the school property is less than $50,000. G. Bond counsel fees, financial advisory fees, printing costs and paying agent and registrar fees for bonds issued pursuant to an election under this section shall be paid from either the amount authorized by the qualified electors of the school district or current operating funds. Bond election expenses shall be paid from current operating funds only. H. For any election conducted to decide whether class B bonds will be issued pursuant to this section: 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, the ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. For a school district that is a career technical education district, the ballot shall include the following statement: ________, a career technical education district, is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $_________ to fund capital improvements at a campus owned or operated and maintained by the career technical education district. 3. The ballot shall conform to the requirements of title 35, chapter 3, article 3. 4. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the county school superintendent and the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district and the county school superintendent of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 5. Not later than thirty-five days before a class B bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $100,000 and $300,000. I. For any election conducted to decide whether impact aid revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue impact aid revenue bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state.  Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "bond approval, yes" and "bond approval, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the legislative council.  The director of the legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 4. Not later than thirty-five days before an impact aid revenue bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district.  The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A statement that impact aid revenue bonds will be fully funded by aid that the school district receives from the federal government and do not require a levy of taxes in the district. (f) A statement that if the bonds are approved, the first priority for the impact aid will be to pay the debt service for the bonds and that other uses of the monies are prohibited until the debt service obligation is met. (g) A statement that if the impact aid revenue bonds are approved, the school district shall not issue or sell class B bonds while the district has existing indebtedness from impact aid revenue bonds, except for bonds issued to refund any bonds issued by the board. J. If the voters approve the issuance of school district class B bonds or impact aid revenue bonds, the school district shall not use the bond proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the bond proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. The proposed capital improvements may be changed by a subsequent election as provided by this section. K. Each school district that issues bonds under this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31, until the bond proceeds are spent, at which an update of the progress of capital improvements financed through bonding is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment. At a minimum, the update shall include a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital bonding plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved capital overrides in funding capital improvements, if any. L. If an election is held to change the purpose or list of capital projects authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that is in addition to the initial capital improvements presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were approved and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A complete list of each capital improvement that was presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were initially approved and that is proposed to be eliminated or to have its cost reduced, and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (f) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided by section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "change capital improvements, yes" and "change capital improvements, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 4. If the election is to add a purpose that was not on the initial ballot, the ballot shall list the purpose that is proposed to be added. M. If an election is held to extend the time to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 6 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided in section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "extend time to issue bonds, yes" and "extend time to issue bonds, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Section 15-905.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-905.01. Truth in taxation; calculation; notice and hearing; vote on tax increase A. Each school district shall determine its truth in taxation base limit for expenditures as follows: 1. Determine the amounts budgeted in fiscal year 1999-2000 for expenditures in the following categories: (a) Desegregation pursuant to section 15-910. (b) Dropout prevention programs. (c) Career and technical education and vocational education center operations pursuant to section 15-910.01. (d) Small school adjustments pursuant to section 15-949. 2. The sum of the expenditures in paragraph 1 of this subsection for fiscal year 1999-2000 shall become the truth in taxation base limit. 3. For any year after fiscal year 1999-2000, a school district whose aggregate budgeted expenditures for the expenditures prescribed in paragraph 1 of this subsection exceed the truth in taxation base limit shall publish a truth in taxation hearing notice that meets the requirements of subsection B of this section. If the amount exceeding the previous truth in taxation base limit is approved by the school district governing board following the hearing prescribed in subsection B of this section, the excess amount plus the previous truth in taxation base limit becomes the school district's new truth in taxation base limit. 4. If a school district no longer qualifies for one or more of the expenditures prescribed in paragraph 1 of this subsection, the amount budgeted for the most recent fiscal year in which the school district was eligible for that expenditure shall be deducted from the school district's truth in taxation base limit. B. For any fiscal year in which a school district governing board budgets an amount that is higher than the truth in taxation base limit calculated pursuant to subsection A of this section, any fiscal year in which a school district levies any amount for adjacent ways pursuant to section 15-995 or any fiscal year in which the school district levies any amount for liabilities in excess of the school district budget pursuant to section 15-907: 1. The school district shall publish a notice that meets the following requirements: (a) The notice shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district. The publication shall be at least ten but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. (b) The notice shall be published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper in which it is published. (c) The notice shall be at least one-fourth page in size and shall be surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) The notice shall be in the following form, excluding the parenthetical explanations, and with the "truth in taxation hearing - notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 15-905.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, _________ school district is notifying its property taxpayers of _________ school district's intention to raise its primary property taxes over the current level to pay for increased expenditures in those areas where the governing board has the authority to increase property taxes for the fiscal year beginning July 1, ____. The _________ school district is proposing an increase in its primary property tax levy of $_________ (amount of levy increase to pay for truth in taxation base increase, the amount of the total levy for the adjacent ways fund and amounts for liabilities in excess of the school district budget pursuant to section 15-907). The amount proposed above will cause _________ school district's primary property taxes on a $100,000 and $300,000 home to be $_________ and $_______, respectively (the amount used to pay for the budget year's proposed truth in taxation base limit and adjacent ways levy, including adjacent ways and liabilities in excess of the school district budget [the amount divided by the current net assessed value available February 10 pursuant to section 42-17052] applied to $100,000 and $300,000). Without the tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed would have been $_________ and $_______, respectively (the amount used to pay for the current year's truth in taxation base limit [the amount divided by the current net assessed value available February 10 pursuant to section 42-17052] applied to $100,000 and $300,000). These amounts proposed are above the qualifying tax levies as prescribed by state law, if applicable. The increase is also exclusive of any changes that may occur from property tax levies for voter approved bonded indebtedness or budget and tax overrides. All interested citizens are invited to attend the public hearing on the proposed tax increase scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). 2. In lieu of publishing the truth in taxation notice, the governing board may mail the truth in taxation notice prescribed by paragraph 1, subdivision (d) of this subsection to all registered voters in the district at least ten but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. 3. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under paragraph 1 of this subsection or mailing the notice under paragraph 2 of this subsection, the governing board shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice to all newspapers of general circulation in the school district. 4. The governing board shall consider a motion to levy the increased property taxes by roll call vote. 5. Within three days after the hearing, the governing board shall mail a copy of the truth in taxation notice, a statement of its publication or mailing and the result of the governing board's vote under paragraph 4 of this subsection to the property tax oversight commission established by section 42-17002. 6. The governing board shall hold the truth in taxation hearing on or before the adoption of the school district budget under section 15-905. 7. Expenditures for adjacent ways and liabilities in excess of the school district budget do not become part of the school district's truth in taxation base limit. C. The department of education shall maintain a listing of each school district's truth in taxation base limit and shall verify the accuracy of the school district's computations. A school district governing board shall notify the department of education of any change in the district's truth in taxation base limit. D. The department of education shall develop a budget form for school districts to show the primary tax rate associated for each of the expenditure categories mentioned in subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section and for expenditures for adjacent ways pursuant to section 15-995 or any other expenditure in excess of the school district budget pursuant to section 15-907. A school district shall make this information available to the general public at truth in taxation hearings and shall submit the information to the department of education. END_STATUTE Sec. 4.4. Section 15-1461.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-1461.01. Truth in taxation notice and hearing; roll call vote on tax increase; definition A. On or before February 10 of the tax year, the county assessor shall transmit and certify to the property tax oversight commission and to the district governing board the total net assessed values that are required to compute the levy limit prescribed by section 42-17051. If the proposed primary property tax levy, excluding amounts that are attributable to new construction, is greater than the amount levied in the preceding tax year by the district: 1. The district governing board shall publish a notice that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The first publication shall be at least fourteen but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. The second publication shall be at least seven but not more than ten days before the date of the hearing. (b) Is published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper in which it is published. (c) Is at least one-fourth page in size and is surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) Is in the following form, with the "truth in taxation hearing-notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 15-1461.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, (name of community college district) is notifying its property taxpayers of (name of community college district's) intention to raise its primary property taxes over last year's level. The (name of community college district) is proposing an increase in primary property taxes of $__________ or _____%. For example, the proposed tax increase will cause (name of community college district's) primary property taxes on a $100,000 and $300,000 home to be $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase) and $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase), respectively. Without the proposed tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed on a $100,000 and $300,000 home would have been $_____ and $_____, respectively. This proposed increase is exclusive of increased primary property taxes received from new construction. The increase is also exclusive of any changes that may occur from property tax levies for voter approved bonded indebtedness or budget and tax overrides. All interested citizens are invited to attend the public hearing on the tax increase that is scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). (e) Is included in the proposed budget and in the budget finally adopted pursuant to section 15-1461. 2. In lieu of publishing the truth in taxation notice, the district board may mail the truth in taxation notice prescribed by paragraph 1, subdivision (d) of this subsection to all registered voters in the district at least ten but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. 3. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under paragraph 1 of this subsection or mailing the notice under paragraph 2 of this subsection, the district governing board shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice to all newspapers of general circulation in the district. The press release must: (a) Include the name of the newspaper of general circulation in which the truth in taxation notice will be published and the dates on which the truth in taxation notice will be published. (b) Be posted on the official website of the community college district. 4. The district board shall consider a motion to levy the increased property taxes by roll call vote. If the proposed levy, exclusive of increased property taxes received from new construction, constitutes an increase over the preceding tax year's levy by fifteen percent or more, the motion to levy the increased property taxes must be approved by a unanimous roll call vote of the district board. 5. Within three days after the hearing, the district board shall mail a copy of the truth in taxation notice, a statement of its publication or mailing and the result of the district board's vote under paragraph 4 of this subsection to the property tax oversight commission established by section 42-17002. 6. The district board shall hold the truth in taxation hearing on or before the adoption of the county, city or town budget under section 42-17105. B. If the governing board fails to comply with the requirements of this section, the governing board shall not fix, levy or assess an amount of primary property taxes that exceeds the preceding year's amount, except for amounts attributable to new construction. C. For the purposes of this section, "amount attributable to new construction" means the net assessed valuation of property added to the tax roll since the previous year multiplied by a property tax rate computed by dividing the district's primary property tax levy in the preceding year by the estimate of the district's total net assessed valuation for the current year, excluding the net assessed valuation attributable to new construction. END_STATUTE Sec. 5.5. Section 35-454, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE35-454. Informational pamphlet for bond election; review; ballot; election; return; canvass of votes; certificate of election A. The governing body or board of the political subdivision shall: 1. At least thirty-five days before the bond election, mail a copy of an informational pamphlet to every household within the political subdivision that contains a registered voter. The pamphlet shall contain information on the: (a) Amount of the bond authorization. (b) Maximum interest rate of the bonds. (c) Estimated debt retirement schedule for the current amount of bonds outstanding, showing both principal and interest payments, the current net assessed valuation as reported by the department of revenue and the current adopted and estimated tax rates.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "net assessed valuation" may include the values used to determine voluntary contributions collected pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, article 3 and title 48, chapter 1, article 8. (d) Estimated debt retirement schedule for the proposed bond authorization, showing both the estimated principal and interest payments and the estimated average annual tax rate for the proposed bond authorization. In preparing this information and the information prescribed by subdivision (c) of this paragraph, the projected total annual increase in net assessed valuation for any future year shall not exceed: (i) For the first five years of the estimated debt retirement schedule, the average of the annual percentage growth for the previous ten years in the net assessed valuation of the political subdivision. (ii) For the remaining years of the estimated debt retirement schedule, twenty percent of the average of the annual percentage growth for the previous ten years in the net assessed valuation of the political subdivision. (e) Source of repayment. (f) Estimated issuance costs. (g) Estimated tax impact of debt service for the bonds on an owner-occupied residence classified as class three pursuant to section 42-12003, on commercial property classified as class one pursuant to section 42-12001, paragraph 12 and on agricultural or other vacant property classified as class two pursuant to section 42-12002, assuming the net assessed valuation of the property increases annually at the lesser of five percent or fifty percent of the projected total annual increase in net assessed valuation as determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of this paragraph over the term of the bonds using the same average annual tax rate as under subdivision (d) of this paragraph, as follows: The tax impact over the term of the bonds on an owner-occupied residence valued by the county assessor at $250,000 and $300,000 is estimated to be $___ per year for __ years, or $___ total cost and $___ per year for ___ years, or $___ total cost, respectively. The tax impact over the term of the bonds on commercial property valued by the county assessor at $1,000,000 and $2,000,000 is estimated to be $____ per year for __ years, or $______ total cost and $___ per year for ___ years, or $___ total cost, respectively. The tax impact over the term of the bonds on agricultural or other vacant property valued by the county assessor at $100,000 is estimated to be $____ per year for ___ years, or $______ total cost. (h) In bold-faced boldface type, estimated total cost of the proposed bond authorization, including principal and interest. (i) Current outstanding general obligation debt and constitutional debt limitation. (j) Projects and expenditures for which the bonds are to be issued. The purpose statement shall only present factual information in a neutral manner. Advocacy for the expenditures is strictly limited to the arguments submitted pursuant to subdivision (n) of this paragraph. (k) Purpose for which the bonds are to be issued and, if applicable, in bold-faced boldface type, that the amount of the proposed bond authorization combined with the current outstanding debt exceeds the political subdivision's constitutional debt limit. (l) Polling location for the addressee. (m) Hours during the day when the polls will be open. (n) Arguments for and against the authorization of one or more of the bond propositions. Each argument filed shall contain the sworn statement of the person submitting it. If the argument is submitted by an organization, it shall contain the sworn statement of two executive officers of the organization.  If the argument is submitted by a political committee, it shall contain the sworn statement of the committee's chairperson or treasurer.  If the argument is submitted by an individual and not on behalf of an organization, a political committee or any other group, the person shall submit the argument with a sworn, notarized statement.  The names of persons and entities submitting written arguments shall be included in the informational pamphlet. Persons signing the argument shall identify themselves by giving their residence address and telephone number, which may not appear in the informational pamphlet, except that the person's city or town and state of residence shall appear in the pamphlet. Any argument that is submitted and that does not comply with this subdivision may not be included in the pamphlet. 2. Set a deadline to submit arguments for and against the authorization of one or more of the bond propositions at a public meeting and publish the deadline in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction of the political subdivision. B. The failure of any one or more electors to receive the informational pamphlet shall not be grounds to invalidate the election. The election shall conform with the general election laws of this state. The return of the election held in a county shall be made to the board of supervisors and, in any other case, to the governing body or board of the municipal corporation or district within twelve days after the election. C. For any proposed general obligation bond authorization for which the principal and interest will be paid by a levy of property taxes, the ballot shall contain the phrase in boldface type "the issuance of these bonds will result in a property tax increase sufficient to pay the annual debt service on bonds". Any written information provided by the political subdivision pertaining to the bond election shall include financial information showing the estimated average tax rate for the proposed bond authorization. If the bonds are to be repaid with secondary property taxes, the ballot shall contain the words "bond approval, yes" and "bond approval, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the following statement: A "yes" vote shall authorize the ______ governing body to issue and sell $______ of ______ bonds of the district to be repaid with secondary property taxes. A "no" vote shall not authorize the ______ governing body to issue and sell such bonds of the district. D. If the governing body intends to use revenues other than property taxes to pay the debt on proposed general obligation bonds, the ballot shall contain the phrase "the issuance of these bonds will result in a property tax increase sufficient to pay the annual debt service on bonds, unless the governing body provides for payment from other sources". E. The board of supervisors, governing body or governing board shall hold a special meeting within twenty days after the election to canvass the votes cast and certify the result.  The certificate of the result shall be prima facie evidence of full performance of all conditions and requirements precedent to holding the election. F. The governing board or body shall file and record in the office of the county recorder a certificate disclosing the purpose of the election, the total number of votes cast and the total number of votes for and against creating the indebtedness, and stating whether or not the indebtedness is ordered.  On filing and recording the certificate, the governing board or body shall carry out the purpose of the election. G. Variations between the estimates required by subsection A of this section and the actual debt retirement schedules, issuance costs, annual and total costs and tax rates shall not invalidate either the election or the bonds. END_STATUTE Sec. 6.6. Section 41-1276, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1276. Truth in taxation levy for equalization assistance to school districts A. On or before February 15 of each year, the joint legislative budget committee shall compute and transmit the truth in taxation rates for equalization assistance for school districts for the following fiscal year to: 1. The chairpersons of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees. 2. The chairpersons of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or their successor committees. B. The truth in taxation rates consist of the qualifying tax rate for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects pursuant to section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 1 and a qualifying tax rate for a unified district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects pursuant to section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2 that will offset the change in net assessed valuation of property that was subject to tax in the prior year. C. The joint legislative budget committee shall compute the truth in taxation rates as follows: 1. Determine the statewide net assessed value for the preceding tax year as provided in section 42-17151, subsection A, paragraph 3. 2. Determine the statewide net assessed value for the current tax year, excluding the net assessed value of property that was not subject to tax in the preceding year. 3. Divide the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection by the amount determined in paragraph 2 of this subsection. 4. Adjust the qualifying tax rates for the current fiscal year by the percentage determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection in order to offset the change in net assessed value. D. Except as provided in subsections E and G of this section, the qualifying tax rate for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects and the qualifying tax rate for a unified school district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects for the following fiscal year shall be the rate determined by the joint legislative budget committee pursuant to subsection C of this section. The committee shall transmit the rates to the superintendent of public instruction and the county boards of supervisors by March 15 of each year. E. If the legislature proposes qualifying tax rates that exceed the truth in taxation rate: 1. The house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing on or before February 28 and publish a notice of a truth in taxation hearing subject to the following requirements: (a) The notice shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in this state that is published at the state capital. The first publication shall be at least fourteen but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing.  The second publication shall be at least seven but not more than ten days before the date of the hearing. (b) The notice shall be published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper. (c) The notice shall be at least one-fourth page in size and shall be surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) The notice shall be in the following form, with the "truth in taxation hearing  notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 41-1276, Arizona Revised Statutes, the state legislature is notifying property taxpayers in Arizona of the legislature's intention to raise the property tax levy over last year's level. The proposed tax increase will cause the taxes on a $100,000 and $300,000 home to be $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase) and $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase), respectively. Without the proposed tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed on a $100,000 and $300,000 home would have been $_______ and $_______, respectively. All interested citizens are invited to attend a public hearing on the tax increase that is scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). (e) For the purposes of computing the tax increase on a $100,000 and $300,000 home as required by the notice, the joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall consider the difference between the truth in taxation rate and the proposed increased rate. 2. The joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall consider any motion to recommend the proposed tax rates to the full legislature by roll call vote. F. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under subsection E, paragraph 1 of this section, the joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice. G. Notwithstanding any other law, the legislature shall not adopt a state budget that provides for qualifying tax rates pursuant to section 15-971 that exceed the truth in taxation rates computed pursuant to subsection A of this section unless the rates are adopted by a concurrent resolution approved by an affirmative roll call vote of two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature before the legislature enacts the general appropriations bill. If the resolution is not approved by two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature, the rates for the following fiscal year shall be the truth in taxation rates determined pursuant to subsection C of this section and shall be transmitted to the superintendent of public instruction and the county boards of supervisors. H. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section and if approved by the qualified electors voting at a statewide general election, the legislature shall not set a qualifying tax rate that exceeds $2.1265 for a common or high school district or $4.253 for a unified school district. The legislature shall not set a county equalization assistance for education rate that exceeds $0.5123. I. Pursuant to subsection C of this section, the qualifying tax rate in tax year 2025 for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447 is $1.5606 and for a unified school district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447 is $3.1212. END_STATUTE Sec. 7.7. Section 42-17107, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-17107. Truth in taxation notice and hearing; roll call vote on tax increase; definition A. On or before February 10 of the tax year, the county assessor shall transmit and certify to the property tax oversight commission and to the governing body of the county, city or town the total net assessed values that are required to compute the levy limit prescribed by section 42-17051. If the proposed primary property tax levy, excluding amounts that are attributable to new construction, is greater than the amount levied by the county, city or town in the preceding tax year in the county, city or town: 1. The governing body shall publish a notice that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city or town. The first publication shall be at least fourteen but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. The second publication shall be at least seven but not more than ten days before the date of the hearing. (b) Is published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper in which it is published. (c) Is at least one-fourth page in size and is surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) Is in the following form, with the "truth in taxation hearing notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 42-17107, Arizona Revised Statutes, (name of county, city or town) is notifying its property taxpayers of (name of county, city or town)'s intention to raise its primary property taxes over last year's level. (name of county, city or town) is proposing an increase in primary property taxes of $__________ or _____%. For example, the proposed tax increase will cause (name of county, city or town)'s primary property taxes on a $100,000 and $300,000 home to be $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase) and $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase), respectively. Without the proposed tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed on a $100,000 and $300,000 home would have been $_____ and $_____, respectively. This proposed increase is exclusive of increased primary property taxes received from new construction. The increase is also exclusive of any changes that may occur from property tax levies for voter approved bonded indebtedness or budget and tax overrides. All interested citizens are invited to attend the public hearing on the tax increase that is scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). (e) Is included in the estimates of revenues and expenses pursuant to section 42-17103 and in the budget finally adopted pursuant to section 42-17105. 2. In lieu of publishing the truth in taxation notice, the governing body may mail the truth in taxation notice prescribed by paragraph 1, subdivision (d) of this subsection to all registered voters in the county, city or town at least ten but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing on the estimates pursuant to section 42-17104. 3. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under paragraph 1 of this subsection or mailing the notice under paragraph 2 of this subsection, the governing body shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice. The press release must: (a) Include the name of the newspaper of general circulation in which the truth in taxation notice will be published and the dates on which the truth in taxation notice will be published. (b) Be posted on the official website of the county, city or town. 4. The governing body shall consider a motion to levy the increased property taxes by roll call vote. If the proposed levy, exclusive of increased property taxes received from new construction, constitutes an increase over the preceding tax year's levy by fifteen percent or more, the motion to levy the increased property taxes must be approved by a unanimous roll call vote of the governing body. 5. Within three days after the hearing, the governing body shall mail a copy of the truth in taxation notice, a statement of its publication or mailing and the result of the governing body's vote under paragraph 4 of this subsection to the property tax oversight commission. 6. The governing body shall hold the truth in taxation hearing on or before the adoption of the county, city or town budget under section 42-17105. B. If the governing body fails to comply with the requirements of this section, the governing body shall not fix, levy or assess an amount of primary property taxes that exceeds the preceding year's amount, except for amounts attributable to new construction. C. For the purposes of this section, "amount attributable to new construction" means the net assessed valuation of property added to the tax roll since the previous year multiplied by a property tax rate computed by dividing the primary property tax levy of the county, city or town in the preceding year by the estimate of the total net assessed valuation of the county, city or town for the current year, excluding the net assessed valuation attributable to new construction. END_STATUTE Sec. 8.8. Section 48-254, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE48-254. Truth in taxation notice and hearing; roll call vote on tax increase; definition A. On or before February 10 of the tax year, the county assessor shall transmit and certify to the property tax oversight commission and to the governing body of each county flood control district, county free library district, county jail district and public health services district the total net assessed values that are required to compute the levy prescribed by sections 48-3620, 48-3903, 48-4023, 48-4023.01 and 48-5805. If the proposed secondary property tax levy of the special taxing district, excluding amounts attributable to new construction, is greater than the amount levied by the special taxing district in the preceding tax year: 1. The governing body shall publish a notice that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The first publication shall be at least fourteen but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing. The second publication shall be at least seven but not more than ten days before the date of the hearing. (b) Is published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper in which it is published. (c) Is at least one-fourth page in size and is surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) Is in the following form, with the "truth in taxation hearing-notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 48-254, Arizona Revised Statutes, (name of special taxing district) is notifying its property taxpayers of (name of special taxing district)'s intention to raise its secondary property taxes over last year's level.  (name of special taxing district) is proposing an increase in secondary property taxes of $__________ or _____%. For example, the proposed tax increase will cause (name of special taxing district)'s secondary property taxes on a $100,000 and $300,000 home to be $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase) and $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase), respectively. Without the proposed tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed on a $100,000 and $300,000 home would have been $_______ and $_____, respectively. This proposed increase is exclusive of increased secondary property taxes received from new construction. The increase is also exclusive of any changes that may occur from property tax levies for voter-approved bonded indebtedness. All interested citizens are invited to attend the public hearing on the tax increase that is scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). (e) Is included in the proposed budget and in the budget finally adopted pursuant to section 48-252. 2. Instead of publishing the truth in taxation notice, the governing body may mail the truth in taxation notice prescribed by paragraph 1, subdivision (d) of this subsection to all registered voters in the special taxing district at least ten but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing on the estimates pursuant to section 42-17104. 3. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under paragraph 1 of this subsection or mailing the notice under paragraph 2 of this subsection, the governing body shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice.  The press release must: (a) Include the name of the newspaper of general circulation in which the truth in taxation notice will be published and the dates on which the truth in taxation notice will be published. (b) Be posted on the official website of the special taxing district. 4. The governing body may only consider a motion to levy the increased property taxes by roll call vote. 5. Within three days after the hearing, the governing body shall mail a copy of the truth in taxation notice, as a statement of its publication or mailing, and the result of the governing body's vote under paragraph 4 of this subsection to the property tax oversight commission. 6. The governing body shall hold the truth in taxation hearing concurrently with the adoption of the county budget under section 42-17105. B. If the governing body fails to comply with the requirements of this section, the governing body may not fix, levy or assess an amount of secondary property taxes that exceeds the preceding year's amount, except for amounts attributable to new construction. C. For the purposes of this section, "amounts attributable to new construction" means the net assessed valuation of property added to the tax roll since the previous year multiplied by a property tax rate computed by dividing the secondary property tax levy of the special taxing district in the preceding year by the estimate of the total net assessed valuation of the special taxing district for the current year, excluding the net assessed valuation attributable to new construction.END_STATUTE